District of Columbia statutes.
20-705

Filing revised and corrected documents.

If a personal representative discovers that any document previously filed or given to interested persons by such representative or by any predecessor personal representative is incomplete or erroneous in any material respect, such representative shall promptly file with the Register or give to the interested persons a revised and corrected document, stating the correct information, if known; provided, however, that statements contained in the petition for probate need not be revised or corrected if the incomplete or erroneous information will be reflected accurately in inventories or accounts later filed with the Register or given to the interested persons.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(gg), 42 DCR 63

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-705.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.